tables/en-us-interline.ctb
# the letter g
begword geo = geoengineering
sufword geoff 1245-15-12356-124 Geoffrey
midword gg 2356
always gh 126
endword gham = Langham
midendword ghill = dunghill
always ghz = (gigahertz)
sufword gnome = gnomedb
word go 1245
sufword good 1245-145
contraction gd
always good-by 1245-145-36-12-13456
syllable grad = leningrad
sufword great 1245-1235-2345
contraction grt

# the letter h
always had 456-125
always hadd 125-1-256 haddock
sufword hade = hadean 
syllable hand 125-12346
word have 125
syllable hawk =
syllable hawthorn 125-1-2456-1456-135-1235-1345
syllable head 125-2-145
syllable heart 125-15-345-2345
always hedgerow 125-1246-1245-15-1235-246
syllable herd 125-12456-145 goatherd
always here 5-125
always hereafter 5-125-1-124
always hered 125-12456-1246
always heren 125-12456-26
midendword herence 125-12456-56-15 adherence
always herer 125-12456-12456
always heres 125-12456-15-234
always heret 125-12456-15-2345
word heretofore 5-125-2345-135-123456-15
word herself 125-12456-124
word him 125-134
word His 6-236
word hm 125-3-134
sufword hmm =
word himself 125-134-124
contraction hmf
lowword his 236
syllable hood =
syllable horn =
syllable horse = horseradish
syllable house 125-1256-234-15 
syllable hydro =

# the letter i
word I 24
midendword iever 24-15-1236-12456
word immediate 24-134-134
contraction imm
word immediately 24-134-134-123-13456
contraction immly
begword immuno = immunofluorescence
lowword in 35
word in =
always in 35
endword in' 35-3
begword incon 35-14-135-1345 incongruous
midendword iness 24-56-234
midendword ing 346
midword inga 35-1245-1 nightingale
always ingar 35-1245-345 Weingarten
midendword ingent 346-26-2345 stringent
midword ingenc 346-26-14 contingency
midword ingen 35-1245-26 palingenesis (new birth)
midword ingi 35-1245-24 meningitis
midendword inging 346-346 bringing
joinword into 35-235
always isinglass 24-234-35-1245-123-1-234-234
always isomer 24-234-135-134-12456
word it 1346
word it's 1346-3-234
word it'd 1346-3-145
word it'll 1346-3-123-123
word its 1346-234
contraction xs
word itself 1346-124
contraction xf
midendword ity 56-13456

# the letter j
word just 245

# the letter k
always know 5-13
word knowledge 13

# the letter l
always \s-\shis 36-36-125-24-234
always \s-\swas 36-36-2456-24-234
word housed 125-1256-234-1246
sufword land 123-12346 landowner
midendword less 46-234
sufword letter 123-1235
contraction lr
sufword newsletter 1345-15-2456-234-123-1235
word unlettered 136-1345-123-1235-1246
word like 123
sufword little 123-123
contraction ll
sufword lone 123-5-135 lonely
always loner 123-135-1345-12456
always lord 5-123

# the letter m
always maha =
always many 456-134
begword mccon 134-14-25
begword mc =
always medic 134-1246-24-14 medicare
midendword ment 56-2345
midword menth 134-26-1456 Blumenthal
always mideast 134-24-145-15-1-34
word milling 134-24-123-123-346
always minestrone 134-35-15-34-1235-135-1345-15
always mishap =
sufword mishear 134-24-234-125-15-345 misheard
begword missh 134-24-234-146 misshapen
word mistook =
begword mistran = mistranslation
sufword mistreat 134-24-234-2345-1235-2-2345
begword mistru = mistrust
begword misty = mistyped
word monetary 134-5-135-2345-345-13456
always mongoose =
word more 134
always mother 5-134
always much 134-16
word must 134-34
word mustn 134-34-1345
word musty 134-34-13456
begword myo = myofibroblasts
word myself 134-13456-124
contraction myf

# the letter n
always name 5-1345
midendword nament 1345-1-56-2345 tournament
always namese =
word near-by 1345-15-345-36-12-13456
prfword necessary 1345-15-14 unnecessary
contraction nec
word neither 1345-15-24
contraction nei
midendword ness 56-234
begword nonen 1345-135-1345-26 nonentity
begword noness = nonessential
word nonetheless 1345-5-135-2346-46-234
always nonex =
begword nong = nongraphical
word noone 1345-135-5-135
begword nose = nosedive
word nosed 1345-135-234-1246
word not 1345
word noways =
word nowhere 1345-135-5-156

# the letter o
word O 135
midword oed = Schroeder
always oen = Phoenix
midendword oence 135-26-14-15 electroencephalogram
largesign of 12356
midendword ofar 135-124-345 insofar
midendword ofa 12356-1 back-translation: sofa
midword ofor 135-123456
always onesi =
midendword oness 135-56-234
midendword oneer 135-1345-15-12456
midendword oned 135-1345-1246
always one 5-135
always oneal = peritoneal
midendword oneless 5-135-46-234 tonelessly
midendword onel = salmonella colonel
always onem = phoneme
midendword onement 5-135-56-2345 atonement
midendword onent 135-1345-26-2345
midendword oneous 135-1345-15-1256-234 erroneous
always oner 135-1345-12456
midendword onese = Cantonese,
word oneself 5-135-124
midendword oness 135-56-234 Deaconess
midendword onet = phonetics bayonet
endword onez = Ordonez
midendword ong 56-1245
always oon = sooner
always osome =
word ou =
always ou 1256
midendword ound 46-145
midendword ount 46-2345
always ourselves 1256-1235-1236-234
word out 1256
always ought 5-1256
always ow 246
word o'clock 135-3-14

# the letter p
always paid 1234-145
contraction pd
always part 5-1234
begword parta 1234-345-2345-1 partake
begword parto 1234-345-2345-135
begword parthen 1234-345-2346-1345 parthenon parthenogenesis
word people 1234
always perceive 1234-12456-14-1236
always perceiving 1234-12456-14-1236-1245
always perhaps 1234-12456-125
begword photo =
always pher 1234-125-12456 cyphered
always pineapple 1234-35-1234-1234-123-15
syllable portion 1234-135-1235-56-1345
syllable port = porthole
begword potho = pothole pothook
begword pre =
always preach 1234-1235-2-16
sufword predator 1234-1235-1246-1-2345-135-1235
always prof =
word prof. 1234-1235-12356-256
begword proff 1234-1235-12356-124 proffer
always profit 1234-1235-12356-24-2345

# the letter q
always quick 12345-13
contraction qk
word quite 12345
always question 5-12345

# the letter r
sufword rafter 1235-1-124-2345-12456
word rather 1235
sufword raw = rawhide
begword reab = reabsorbed
always reac =
always reach 1235-2-16
begword readj = readjust
begword readm = readmit
begword reaff 1235-15-1-235
sufword reagent 1235-15-1-1245-26-2345
begword reagg 1235-15-1-2356 reaggregated
begword realig = realign
begword rean = reanalyze, reanimate
begword reapp = reappear
begword reass 1235-15-1-234-234
begword reatt = reattach
begword reau = reauthorization
begword reaw = reawaken
begword rede =
begword redi =
word redo =
word redone 1235-15-145-5-135
begword redou 1235-15-145-1256 redouble redoubt 
always redu =
always receive 1235-14-1236
contraction rcv
contraction rcvd
contraction rcvr
contraction rcvs
always receiving 1235-14-1236-1245
contraction rcvg
begword redis = redistribute
begword redr = redress
word reichstag 1235-15-24-16-234-2345-1-1245
always rejoice 1235-245-14
contraction rjc
contraction rjcd
contraction rjcr
contraction rjcs
always rejoicing 1235-245-14-1245
contraction rjcg
sufword renaming 1235-15-1345-1-134-346 renamings
begword rene =
begword renom = renominate
begword renou 1235-15-1345-1256 renounce
sufword renown 1235-15-1345-246-1345 renowned
begword renu = renunciation
begword rera = reradiate
sufword reread 1235-15-1235-2-145
sufword rerun = reruns
always rever 1235-15-1236-12456
always reveren 1235-5-15-26 irreverent
always reverence 1235-5-15-56-15 irreverence
sufword reverie 1235-5-15-24-15
begword ribof =
begword ribon =
always right 5-1235

# the letter s
word said 234-145
contraction sd
syllable screw = screwhole
begword seda =
always sedu =
always sent 234-26-2345 sentimental
always sever 234-15-1236-12456 perseverance 
always several 234-5-15-1-123 severally
word shall 146
word sh =
always sh 146
always shaus = In German names
sufword should 146-145
always shoulder 146-1256-123-145-12456
word singapore 234-346-1-1234-135-1235-15 
midendword sion 46-1345
midword stak 234-2345-1-13
midendword stion 234-56-1345
word so 234
always some 5-234
midendword somed 234-135-134-1246 ransomed
always somer 234-135-134-12456 somersault 
always spirit 456-234
midendword ssword 234-234-45-2456 crossword 
partword st 34
always sth 234-1456
always sthe 234-2346
word still 34
always stime 234-5-2345
midendword stown 234-2345-246-1345 Pickstown
begword styro 34-13456-1235-135 styrofoam
always ssh =
word such 234-16
word sch =
always sword =

# the letter t
word th =
always th 1456
word that 2345
word this 1456
word thyself 1456-13456-124
word tiddledywinks 2345-24-256-123-15-145-13456-2456-35-13-234
always tnam =
joinword to 235
word today 2345-145
contraction td
word tomorrow 2345-134
contraction tm
word tonight 2345-1345
contraction tn
always thead 2345-125-2-145
always theast 1456-15-1-34
largesign the 2346
always thea 2346-1 theater
word themselves 2346-134-1236-234
always their 456-2346
always thence 1456-56-15
always there 5-2346
midendword thereal 2346-1235-2-123 ethereal
word thereupon 5-2346-45-136
always thereafter 5-2346-1-124
always thered 2346-1235-1246
always therer 2346-1235-12456
always theres 2346-1235-15-234 theresa therese 
midendword tion 56-1345
always time 5-2345
midendword timed 1245-24-134-1246
midendword timer 2345-24-134-12456
midendword timet = altimeter
word these 45-2346
always through 5-1456
word together 2345-1245-1235
contraction tgr
word those 45-1456
begword trans = transtype

# the letter u
begword un = unameliorated
begword unble = unblemished
begword uncon = uncongenial
begword undis = undisturbed
begword uneas = unease
begword uneat = uneaten
sufword unful = unfulfilled
begword unmen 136-1345-134-26 unmentioned
word upon 45-136 Dupont
word us 136
always under 5-136
word unsaid 136-1345-234-145

# the letter v
begword vaing 1236-1-35-1245 vainglory
word very 1236
begword vice = viceroy

# the letter w
lowword was 356
word wh =
always wh 156
midendword whart 2456-125-345-2345 Newhart
word which 156
word will 2456
lowword were 2356
lowword Were 6-2356 for back-translation
always where 5-156
word whereupon 5-156-45-136
word wherever 156-12456-5-15
largesign with 23456
always word 45-2456
word whose 45-156
always work 5-2456
sufword would 2456-145
word would've 2456-145-3-1236-15
contraction wd
always world 456-2456

# the letter x

# the letter y
word you 13456
word you'd 13456-3-145
word you'll 13456-3-123-123
word you're 13456-3-1235-15
word you've 13456-3-1236-15
always young 5-13456
word your 13456-1235
contraction yr
word yours 13456-1235-234
contraction yrs
word yourself 13456-1235-124
contraction yrf
word yourselves 13456-1235-1236-234
contraction yrvs

# the letter z

# Système International Prefixes
begword yotta 13456-135-2345-2345-1 10^24
begword zetta 1356-15-2345-2345-1 10^21
# begword exa 15-1346-1 10^18
begword peta 1234-15-2345-1 10^15
begword tera 2345-12456-1 10^12
begword giga 1245-24-1245-1 10^9
begword mega 134-15-1245-1 10^6
begword kilo 13-24-123-135 10^3
begword hecto 125-15-14-2345-135 10^2
begword deca 145-15-14-1 10^1
begword deci 145-15-14-24 10^-1
begword centi 14-26-2345-24 10^-2
begword milli 134-24-123-123-24 10^-3
begword micro 134-24-14-1235-135 10^-6
begword nano 1345-1-1345-135 10^-9
begword pico 1234-24-14-135 10^-12
begword femto 124-15-134-2345-135 10^-15
begword atto 1-2345-2345-135 10^-18
begword zepto 1356-15-1234-2345-135 10^-21
begword yocto 13456-135-14-2345-135 10^-24
begword anti =
# begword endo 26-145-135 endow
begword epi =
begword extra =
begword hyper 125-13456-1234-12456
begword hypo =
begword infra 35-124-1235-1
begword inter 35-2345-12456
begword intra 35-2345-1235-1
begword iso =
begword macro =
begword meta =
begword micro =
begword mono =
begword multi =
begword patho 1234-1-1456-135
begword peri 1234-12456-24
begword poly =
begword post 1234-135-34
begword pre =
begword pseudo =
begword retro =
# begword semi = seminar
begword sub =
begword super 234-136-1234-12456
# begword tetra =
begword trans =
begword ultra =
# begword uni =
